  Skip to main content                    Search form   Search            Visit AWN on Twitter  Visit AWN on Facebook  Visit AWN on Google Plus  Subscribe to AWN              Log In | Register             Home  News  Blogs  AnimationWorld  VFXWorld  Events  Forums  Jobs  More Interviews  Reviews  Galleries  All Categories  AWNtv Most Recent Videos  Top Playlists  All Video Categories   Animation Industry Database  Filmporium Store  How To Succeed in Animation                             Inside the OASIS: ILM’s Roger Guyett Talks ‘Ready Player One’    Industrial Light & Magic Artists creates the virtual reality world the OASIS for director Steven Spielberg’s mind-bending joyride.                              The Visual Effects of Wes Anderson’s ‘Isle of Dogs’    Senior VFX supervisor Tim Ledbury details previs, production and post for Anderson’s second stop-motion animated feature.         Keep it in Motion - Classic Animation Revisited: 'Sillon 672'    An exploration of the sensually seductive grooves of Bastian Dupriez's abstract short film, 'Sillon 672' (2014), spiced with a dash of Jerry Lee Lewis.         Review: ‘Hunter x Hunter: Phantom Rouge’    It’s not surprising this film opened at number one in Japan when it first hit theaters in 2013.         Pixar Revisits The Parr Family in ‘Incredibles 2’    Art department leads discuss the tools and techniques used to bring director Brad Bird’s sequel to the screen.         Our Jungle Lush Tangles with the Lush Jungles of ‘Archer: Danger Island’    Our hero, sporting an eye patch and pressed khakis, crashes, splashes, slashes and drinks his way through the treacherous 1939 South Pacific tropics in the brand-new season of FXX...         Uprooted: MPC Tackles Disney’s ‘A Wrinkle in Time’    MPC CG supervisor Chris Downs details the production of 350 visual effects shots for director Ava DuVernay’s adaptation of ‘A Wrinkle in Time.’         A New Milestone for Chinese Feature Animation: ‘Big Fish & Begonia’...    Twelve years in the making, epic fantasy adventure written, produced and directed by animators Xuan Liang and Chun Zhang is hailed as the forefront of the burgeoning Chinese...                Feature Animation  ANIMATIONWorld   A New Milestone for Chinese Feature Animation: ‘Big Fish & Begonia’ Arrives in North America    By Jennifer Wolfe | Tuesday, April 3, 2018 at 6:56pm               Twelve years in the making, epic fantasy adventure written, produced and directed by animators Xuan Liang and Chun Zhang is hailed as the forefront of the burgeoning Chinese animation industry.       In 2D , 3D , Films , Flash , People , Places , Short Films | ANIMATIONWorld | Geographic Region: Asia , North America Read More about A New Milestone for Chinese Feature Animation: ‘Big Fish & Begonia’ Arrives in North America »        AMPAS  Headline News   Mechanic Blasts Academy in Board Resignation    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 2:35pm               Former Fox executive writes the organization has mishandled diversity issue, let Oscars ratings and relevance slide and failing to keep the Academy Museum project on schedule and budget.       In Awards , Films , People | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News , VFXWorld | Special Events: Academy Awards | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Mechanic Blasts Academy in Board Resignation »        Home Entertainment  Headline News   Score ‘Early Man’ on Digital May 15, on Disc May 22    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 2:12pm               Acclaimed stop-motion feature directed by Nick Park features the voices of Eddie Redmayne, Tom Hiddleston and Maisie Williams.       In Films , Home Entertainment , Special Features , Stop-Motion | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Score ‘Early Man’ on Digital May 15, on Disc May 22 »        theme parks  Headline News   Universal Details Immersive ‘Kung Fu Panda’ Attraction    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 1:51pm               Interior projection mapping and seats that swivel with the story mark the new attraction, housed in the new DreamWorks Theatre, opening June 15 at the theme park in Hollywood.       In 3D , CG , Films , Technology , Theme Parks - Installations , Visual Effects | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News , VFXWorld | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Universal Details Immersive ‘Kung Fu Panda’ Attraction »        Events  Headline News   2018 animago Awards Open for Submissions    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 1:16pm               Annual gathering adds two new categories -- VR/AR and feature film -- for the 2018 edition, set for April 25-26 in Munich.       In 2D , 3D , Art , Awards , Call for Entries , CG , Commercials , Event , Films , Games , Internet and Interactive , Motion Graphics , Short Films , Technology , Virtual Reality | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News , VFXWorld | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about 2018 animago Awards Open for Submissions »        Anime  Headline News   Animation Block Party Fetes 30 Years of ‘Akira’    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 12:41pm               Katsuhro Otomo’s anime classic will screen in Brooklyn at the 15 th edition of the festival, set for July 26-29.       In Anime , Festival , Films , Special Tributes | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Animation Block Party Fetes 30 Years of ‘Akira’ »           Wish Dragon  Headline News   Jackie Chan Leads Voice Cast of ‘Wish Dragon’    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 11:05am               Constance Wu, Natasha Liu Bordizzo and more join the animated feature based on ‘1001 Nights’ from Sony, Beijing Sparkle Roll Media and Base Animation.       In Films , People , Places , Voice Acting | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , Asia , North America Read More about Jackie Chan Leads Voice Cast of ‘Wish Dragon’ »        People  Headline News   DHX Media Shuffles Executive Deck    By Tom McLean | Wednesday, April 18, 2018 at 10:43am               Aaron Ames appointed chief operating officer; Josh Scherba as president, and Anne Loi as chief commercial officer; co-founder Steven Denure announces departure.       In Business , Digital Media , Internet and Interactive , Jobs & Recruiting , People , Television | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about DHX Media Shuffles Executive Deck »        Animafest Zagreb  Headline News   ‘Isle of Dogs’ Tops Animafest Zagreb Feature Lineup    By Tom McLean | Tuesday, April 17, 2018 at 3:40pm               Grand Competition also includes ‘A Dog’s Life,’ ‘Cinderella the Cat,’ ‘The Magnificent Cake!’ and ‘The Shower.’       In 2D , 3D , Festival , Films , Stop-Motion | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about ‘Isle of Dogs’ Tops Animafest Zagreb Feature Lineup »        Festival  Headline News   Hosoda’s ‘Mirai’ to Screen at Directors’ Fortnight in Cannes    By Tom McLean | Tuesday, April 17, 2018 at 2:35pm               Film to receive fall 2018 North American theatrical release.       In Anime , Festival , Films , People , Places | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , Asia , Europe , North America Read More about Hosoda’s ‘Mirai’ to Screen at Directors’ Fortnight in Cannes »        Festival  Headline News   Tribeca Festival Announces 2018 Juries    By Tom McLean | Tuesday, April 17, 2018 at 2:17pm               Fest assembles a wide selection of top directors, actors, producers and storytellers to recognize the best work.       In Acting , Awards , Festival , Films , Games , Internet and Interactive , People , Places , Short Films , Special Tributes , Technology , Television , Virtual Reality , Visual Effects | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News , VFXWorld | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Tribeca Festival Announces 2018 Juries »        Annecy 2018  Headline News   Annecy Festival Announces 2018 Virtual Reality Selections    By AWN Staff Editor | Tuesday, April 17, 2018 at 1:37pm               Eleven projects selected from 75 submissions for this year’s VR@ANNECY (link sends e-mail) program.       In 2D , 3D , Festival , People , Short Films , Technology , Virtual Reality | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Special Events: Annecy | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Annecy Festival Announces 2018 Virtual Reality Selections »           Dreamworks Animation  Headline News   DreamWorks Animation Unveils New Title, Synopsis for ‘How to Train Your Dragon 3’    By Jennifer Wolfe | Tuesday, April 17, 2018 at 11:00am               Attendees of the 2018 edition of the Annecy International Animation Film Festival to get a sneak peek at the culmination of director Dean DeBlois’s ‘How to Train Your Dragon’ franchise.       In 3D , CG , Festival , Films , People , Short Films | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Special Events: Annecy | Geographic Region: Europe , North America Read More about DreamWorks Animation Unveils New Title, Synopsis for ‘How to Train Your Dragon 3’ »        Annecy 2018  Headline News   DreamWorks Animation Presenting Two New Shorts at Annecy    By Jennifer Wolfe | Tuesday, April 17, 2018 at 8:30am               Studio lineup for the 2018 Edition of the Annecy International Animation Film Festival also includes a sneak-peek into the making of DWA’s 2019 release, ‘How to Train Your Dragon: The Hidden World.’       In 2D , 3D , CG , Event , Festival , Films , People , Places , Production , Short Films , Television | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Special Events: Annecy | Geographic Region: Europe , North America Read More about DreamWorks Animation Presenting Two New Shorts at Annecy »        Visual Effects  Headline News   Axis Creates the Digital World for TV Drama ‘Kiss Me First’    By Tom McLean | Monday, April 16, 2018 at 4:12pm               Leading U.K. production studio built the online universe of Azana, blending live-action with CG animation across 50 minutes of content.       In 3D , CG , Technology , Television , Visual Effects | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News , VFXWorld | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Axis Creates the Digital World for TV Drama ‘Kiss Me First’ »        Festival  Headline News   Annecy Takes Five Features to Cannes Market    By Tom McLean | Monday, April 16, 2018 at 3:44pm               In-progress animated features will be presented to distributors, investors and sales reps for the third consecutive year.       In Business , Festival , Films , Places , Production | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Special Events: Annecy | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Annecy Takes Five Features to Cannes Market »        Festival  Headline News   ReAnimania’s 10th Edition Open for Submissions    By Tom McLean | Monday, April 16, 2018 at 2:51pm               Festival will celebrate the 80 th anniversary of Armenian animation.       In Call for Entries , Commercials , Festival , Films , Music and Sound , Places , Short Films , Television | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about ReAnimania’s 10th Edition Open for Submissions »        Education  Headline News   ASIFA's Animation Educators Forum Opens Annual Scholarship Program    By Tom McLean | Monday, April 16, 2018 at 2:25pm               Online applications now accepted through May 7.       In Call for Entries , Education and Training | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about ASIFA's Animation Educators Forum Opens Annual Scholarship Program »     ADVERTISEMENT   Ad        by Taboola  by Taboola  Sponsored Links  Sponsored Links  Promoted Links  Promoted Links  You May Like CriticsUnion Top 10 Mortgage Lenders of 2018 CriticsUnion Undo Pictures from the Brainbox: A Weekly Dose of Indie Animation - 'Symphony No. 42' Undo        Interview  ANIMATIONWorld   Pictures from the Brainbox: A Weekly Dose of Indie Animation - 'Symphony No. 42'    By Chris Robinson | Monday, April 16, 2018 at 6:00am               Hungarian animator Réka Bucsi talks about the making of her short film, 'Symphony No. 42' (2014)       In Art , Films , Production , Short Films | ANIMATIONWorld | Blogs: Let's Go Eat the Factory! | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Pictures from the Brainbox: A Weekly Dose of Indie Animation - 'Symphony No. 42' »        Business  Headline News   Editorial Employees at Nickelodeon Animation Studio Unionize    By Tom McLean | Friday, April 13, 2018 at 3:21pm               Business, Nickelodeon Animation Studio, Motion Picture Editors Guild, Local 700, IATSE, preproduction, postproduction, The Animation Guild,       In Business , Jobs & Recruiting , Post-production , Production , Television | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Editorial Employees at Nickelodeon Animation Studio Unionize »        People  Headline News   Paramount Scoops Up ‘Boss Baby’ Producer Ramsey Naito    By Tom McLean | Friday, April 13, 2018 at 2:59pm               Veteran executive and producer will oversee production on the studio’s current projects and seek out new ones to develop.       In Business , Films , People , Production | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Paramount Scoops Up ‘Boss Baby’ Producer Ramsey Naito »        Festival  Headline News   Animafest Zagreb Lineup Announced    By Tom McLean | Friday, April 13, 2018 at 2:12pm               More than 350 films from around the globe will screen in and out of competition.       In Awards , Education and Training , Festival , Places , Short Films | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Animafest Zagreb Lineup Announced »        Technology  Headline News   Substance Plugin for 3ds Max Ready for Production    By Tom McLean | Friday, April 13, 2018 at 1:19pm               Material authoring tool adds support for Corona Renderer and Octane.       In 3D , Business , CG , Films , Technology , Visual Effects | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News , VFXWorld | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Substance Plugin for 3ds Max Ready for Production »        Festival  Headline News   Edinburgh Fest Sets Advance ‘Incredibles 2’ Screenings    By Tom McLean | Friday, April 13, 2018 at 1:01pm               Family gala presentation of the new Pixar feature set for June 24.       In 3D , CG , Festival , Films , Places | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , Europe Read More about Edinburgh Fest Sets Advance ‘Incredibles 2’ Screenings »        Disney  Headline News   Watch: New Trailer, Poster, Image from ‘Incredibles 2’    By Tom McLean | Friday, April 13, 2018 at 12:48pm               Clip offers a deeper look at the story, in which Elastigirl embarks on a campaign to restore the Supers’ reputation, leaving Mr. Incredible home alone with the kids.       In 3D , CG , Films | ANIMATIONWorld , Headline News | Geographic Region: All , North America Read More about Watch: New Trailer, Poster, Image from ‘Incredibles 2’ »      Pages 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 … next › last »            Trending Now:       The Visual Effects of Wes Anderson’s ‘...      Mechanic Blasts Academy in Board...      Score ‘Early Man’ on Digital May 15, on...      Universal Details Immersive ‘Kung Fu...                         Top Headline News        Annecy Festival Announces 2018 Virtual Reality Selections       DreamWorks Animation Presenting Two New Shorts at Annecy       Watch: New Trailer, Poster, Image from ‘Incredibles 2’       Women in Animation Announces Anti-Harassment Pledge       DreamWorks Buys Two Projects from Leo Matsuda       ‘The Art of Google Spotlight Stories’ Now Available!       Mechanic Blasts Academy in Board Resignation       Score ‘Early Man’ on Digital May 15, on Disc May 22      See More »                Career Connections    TV Series Director (Animation)  Confidential   Faculty Game Design and Development  Cogswell College, LLC   Science and Technology Graphics and Communications Designer in Arlington, VA at Booz Allen Hamilton  Booz Allen Hamilton   Visual Designer  HP   Art Director (L09)  Synchrony Financial   Producer (203)  Ubisoft Reflections  See More »      Recent Comments        Rafał Tłuchowski  Did you noticed antennas "bouncing" on the right side of the screen when camera is flying over the cargo containers city of  Columbus ? Or it was just me ? :)  Inside the OASIS: ILM’s Roger Guyett Talks ‘Ready, Player One’ · 13 hours ago     Gerry  Great article! Looking forward to this sequel way more than most superhero flicks!  Pixar Revisits The Parr Family in ‘Incredibles 2’ · 1 day ago     Nuala Quinn-Barton  Looking forward to seeing this!  ILM’s Richard McBride Helps Conjure Other Worlds for Disney’s ‘A Wrinkle in Time’ · 1 week ago     Star Lawrence  It looks cute! Congrats.... Meanwhile, I am trying to get INTO your business...irony.  The Early Bird Gets The Worm · 1 week ago     rey umadhay  My son has been asking me to find some of your videos and soundtrack however i cannot find it. Can we please ask for the real name of the show. Thank you.  Chinese Stone Lions Now an Actual Reality · 1 week ago     Laura Jones  One day, you will understand, too.  Animated Propaganda During the Cold War: Part Two · 1 week ago         Recent Reviews             Keep it in Motion - Classic Animation Revisited: 'Sillon 672'         Review: ‘Hunter x Hunter: Phantom Rouge’         Keep it in Motion - Classic Animation Revisited: 'AOS'      See More »                Featured Blogs          10 Till 6    Dan Sarto         2Day in Animation    Bob Lincoln         Ambling Around    Sharon Katz         Animated Travels    Dan Sarto         Casually Uninformed    Dan Sarto         Chew On This    Chris Robinson         Creative Transformation: Learning for the Conceptual Age    Robin King         Ed Hooks - Acting for Animators    Ed Hooks         FADE IN: on Screenwriting, by Jeffrey Scott    Jeffrey Scott         Fan Services    Donna Bulford         FMX Conference Spotlight    Dan Sarto         Let's Go Eat the Factory!    Chris Robinson         Lines of Thought    Janet Blatter         Perry's Previews – Insights from a Child Film Critic    Perry Chen         Reality Bites    Kevin Geiger         Reflections    Edward Bakst         Sprockets    Nancy Denney-Phelps         StashTV    Stephen Price         The Animation Pimp    Chris Robinson         The Anime Beat    James Brusuelas         The Career Rebel    Lisa Kaye         The Making of a Dream - An Animation Production Blog    Mark Simon         The Miscweant    Joe Strike         VIEW Conference Spotlight    Dan Sarto      See More »        Most Popular       Pixar Revisits The Parr Family in ‘Incredibles 2’  1 comment · 1 day ago    ILM’s Richard McBride Helps Conjure Other Worlds for Disney’s ‘A Wrinkle in Time’  1 comment · 1 week ago    The Early Bird Gets The Worm  1 comment · 1 week ago    GKIDS Releasing ‘Lu Over the Wall’ Nationwide on May 11  3 comments · 3 weeks ago    Wes Anderson’s ‘Isle of Dogs’ Gives Erudite Canines Their Day  1 comment · 2 weeks ago    ‘Ren & Stimpy’ Creator Accused of Sexual Misconduct with Minors  1 comment · 2 weeks ago         Recent Interviews             Inside the OASIS: ILM’s Roger Guyett Talks ‘Ready Player One’         Pictures from the Brainbox: A Weekly Dose of Indie Animation - '...         Our Jungle Lush Tangles with the Lush Jungles of ‘Archer: Danger Island’      See More »                Elsewhere on AWN             Free Download: Special Annecy Edition of Animation World Magazine         A Maverick in the Making         A Candid Talk with Scratch Film Master Steven Woloshen         Marcy Page Leaves Her Mark on the NFB         Hayao Miyazaki – The Interview         Chris Landreth Talks 'Subconscious Password'         The Magical Junk-Filled World of Jiří Barta         Alain Gagnol Talks 'A Cat in Paris'                    Animation World Network   Contact Us | About Us | Terms Of Service | Privacy Policy | Media Kit      More Animation World Network Sites   AWNtv.com: AWN Television | Videos | Channels | Categories | Playlists | Submit Your Films AIDB.com: Animation Industry Database | Production Companies | VFX Houses | Schools       © 2017 AWN, Inc. AWN.com - Part of the Animation World Network - 13300 Victory Blvd. Suite 365 Van Nuys, CA 91401                This advertisement will automatically close in 1 second. close#^$                                                                                                                                                                                                                      Menu            Lifewire           Animation & Video    Search        Search the site   GO          Software        Animation & Video         Documents       Spreadsheets       Presentations       Desktop Publishing       Graphic Design       Databases            How To    Windows  Macs  iPad  iPhone  Android  Internet & Network  Digital Cameras  Home Theater  Email & Messaging      Fix    Windows  Macs  iPad  iPhone  Internet & Network  Digital Cameras  Home Theater  Getting More Help      Buy    Buying Guides  Product Reviews  Software & Apps      Do More    Web & Search  Social Media  Gaming  New & Next            How To  › Software  Animation & Video  From tutorials, resources, and software recommendations, here's everything you need to start animating and creating video with the best tools out there.           Software     Documents       Spreadsheets       Presentations       Desktop Publishing       Graphic Design       Databases          Animation & Video         View More            List  10 Art Supplies no Traditional Animator Should Be Without       Article  Everything You Need to Know about Walt Disney Company      Article  What's The Difference Between Japanese and American Animation?                       Article  How to Create A 3D Bump Map in Photoshop         List  How to Create a Basic 8-Frame Animated Walk-Cycle         Article  5 Things to Do Before You Ever Start Animating         Article  What is Vector Animation?         Article  How are Traditional and Computer Animation Different?         Article  What's The Difference Between Shape, Motion, and Classic Tweens?         Article  What Is an Animation in Presentation Software?         Article  How to Embed Your SWF in a Webpage         Article  What's the Difference? Flash Graphics and Movie Clips?         Article  OpenToonz Software Program Review         List  Five Powerful and Affordable Animation Applications for the Mac         Article  A Beginner's Guide to Computer Animation         Article  Understanding the Differences Between AutoCAD and Other 3D Programs         Article  Learn What an Animatic Is and How It Is Used in Film and Animation         Article  How to Make Kinetic Typography in After Effects         Article  What Are Keyframes?         List  From Gouache to Gadgets: Shopping For the Animator on Your Holiday Gift List         Article  The Pros and Cons of Flash and Animated GIFs         Article  Give Your 2D Animation Distinctive Style with These Tricks         Article  The Relationship Between Animation, Basic Phonemes, and Lip-Synching         Article  Do You Know How Layers Are Used in Animation and Graphics?         List  How to Add Simple Stops in Flash Action Script         Article  Tips on How to Create an Animation Resume         Article  Here Is An Overview of Motion Tweening in Flash         Article  How Can You Make an Animation Flip Book?         Article  Animating for Video Games and Movies: What's the Difference?         List  Here Is How to Import Multiple Images Simultaneously in Flash         Article  Potential Problems with Being a Freelance Animator         Article  Royalty-Free Music and Sound Effects Resources for Animators         List  Understanding the Main Tools in 3D Studio Max         List  Find out How to Animate a Zoom Effect in Flash         Article  How to Use the Trace Bitmap Function for Flash Animation         Article  Learn About Cutout Animation and Find out Which Shows Use it         Article  Here Are Some Tips on How to Best Use Lights in After Effects         Article  What is An Animation Pitch Bible?         Article  Learn About Pixilation and How It Is Different Than Stop-Motion         Article  Find out What a Lyric Video Is         List  How to Create a New Scene in Flash (Lesson 10)         Article  Learn How Persistence of Vision and Animation Work Together         List  A Beginner's Guide to Animation Character Sheets/Breakdowns         Article  What Is a Wireframe?         Article  What Are Structural and Center Lines?         Article  Learn About a Peg Bar and How It Is Used in Hand Drawn Animation         List  Here Are Some Great Tips on How to Animate a Pan Effect in Flash         Article  Here Is a Look at the Average Salary That an Animator Can Expect         Article  The Innovative Process of Drawn-on-Film Animation         Article  The Basics of Animation Style Guides         Article  Find out What Motion Graphics Are        Article  Definition and Examples of Limited Animation         Article  How to Make Your Animation React to Music in After Effects         Article  What Are Ones, Twos, and Threes in Animation?         Article  Learn How to Animate In Photoshop with AnimDessin2         Article  Here Is a Look at the Best Photoshop Brush Plugin         Article  What Are After Effects Expressions?         Article  All About Animation and Storyboards' Role in the Scriptwriting Process         Article  Live Animation on the Simpsons and         Article  Moana Review        View More         Learn more about Software    Documents       Spreadsheets       Presentations       Desktop Publishing       Graphic Design       Databases       Animation & Video        View more                Lifewire                 Get the Most From Your Tech With Our Daily Tips      Email Address   Sign up   There was an error. Please try again.    You're in! Thanks for signing up.  There was an error. Please try again.  Thank you for signing up.      Follow Us        Facebook            How To  Fix  Buy  Do More     About Us  Advertise  Privacy Policy  Careers  Contact  Terms of Use          #^$  .               Front 
          Page > Features > The History of Animation             Main 
                Sections      Front 
                Page      News 
                Archives      dFX 
                Newsletter      Interviews      Features      Columns      Reviews      Special Areas      Artists      Maquettes      Movie 
                Sites      Movie 
                Trailers      Forum 
                Insights      Special 
                Reports      Interactivity      Animation 
                Forums      For 
                Fun      Digital Media FX     Advertise     About 
                dFX      Press 
                Room      Search 
                Site      Animation Stores      DVD 
                Store      Book 
                Store      Music 
                Store      Poster 
                Store      Cool 
                Items Store      More dFX Sites      Animation 
                History      Animation
                        Forums      Other
              Resources    Add
                      Your Resource     Contact      Joe 
                Tracy      Email 
                News Tip     Buy Posters at AllPosters.com   Subscribe 
          to the Digital Media FX Newsletter - covering the animation, 3D, CGI, and FX Industries                      The History 
                of Animation: Advantages and Disadvantages of the Studio System in the Production of an Art Form   (by 
                Michael Crandol) "Animation should be an art....what you 
                fellows have done with it is making it into a trade....not an 
                art, but a trade....bad luck ." Thus Winsor McCay, father 
                of the animated cartoon, pronounced the doom of the very industry 
                he had inadvertently helped create.  From 1911-21 
                McCay nursed animation from a simple camera trick to full blown 
                character animation that would take 20 years to be surpassed. 
                McCay animated his films almost single-handed; from inception 
                to execution each cartoon was his and his alone. He took the time 
                to make his films unique artistic visions, sometimes spending 
                more than a year to make a single five-minute cartoon. But the 
                burgeoning world of cinema could not wait so long for so little, 
                and so the modern animation studio came into being. The art of 
                animation was no longer the work of one man, it was a streamlined, 
                assembly-line process in the best Henry Ford tradition. But was 
                the art of the animated cartoon sacrificed for the trade's sake? 
                That, of course, depends on the studios themselves.  Through the 
                years several institutions have proven McCay's prophecy at least 
                partly false; indeed, without such positive collaborations of 
                talent the art of animation would not have advanced to the level 
                of sophistication it enjoys today. But who exactly was it "bad 
                luck" for: the art, or the artists themselves?   Even before 
                McCay had shown the world the true potential of the animated cartoon 
                in his landmark film "Gertie the Dinosaur" (1914), the 
                first animation studios were already around, trying to exploit 
                the medium for what they could. Raoul Barre' opened the first 
                animation house in 1913, and within five years a new industry 
                was born as more and more studios began to pop up around the New 
                York metropolitan area.  Arguably the 
                most successful and certainly the most influential of these early 
                studios was the the John Bray Studio. Bray created the first successful 
                cartoon series, Col. Heeza Liar, in 1914. Future studio heads 
                Max Fleischer and Walter Lantz honed their skills here. But the 
                studio's most important contribution to the medium was the introduction 
                of cels. The process of inking the animator's drawings onto clear 
                pieces of celluloid and then photographing them in succession 
                on a single painted background was invented by Bray employee Earl 
                Hurd in late 1914. In the first of what was to be many such incidents, 
                the studio swallowed all the credit and most of the revenue for 
                it's underling's contribution to the art form. Hurd lent his patent 
                to boss John Bray, who charged royalties for other studios to 
                use the process....an understandable business practice. Yet from 
                an artistic standpoint this was as if Picasso had demanded exclusive 
                rights to Cubism. It was a relatively moot point, however; the 
                patent expired in 1932 and was not renewed. The only real loser, 
                it seems, was Earl Hurd.  Like Hurd, 
                Otto Messmer was another studio employee who never got due credit 
                for his innovations. But whereas Hurd's contribution to animation 
                was a technical one, Messmer's was an artistic creation that is 
                still recognized the world over 80 years after it's inception. 
                Otto Messmer 
                was employed by the Pat Sullivan Studio in 1916. Three years later 
                he created Felix the Cat; it was a milestone in the development 
                of animation as an artform. Not since Gertie the Dinosaur had 
                a cartoon character exhibited such a degree of personality animation 
                as Felix's brooding, ponderous walk. But unlike Gertie, Felix 
                was a studio character, which meant audiences could look forward 
                to seeing him again and again, while affording Messmer and his 
                co-workers the opportunity to explore the possibilities of ongoing 
                character development in animation. Meanwhile, studio head Pat 
                Sullivan took sole credit for the creation of Felix, earning millions 
                of dollars in royalties over the years. Messmer continued to receive 
                his usual salary. A quiet and unassuming man, Messmer never challenged 
                Sullivan's claim to be the father of Felix, even after Sullivan's 
                death in 1933. Indeed, Messmer probably would have taken the secret 
                to his grave had not animation historian John Canemaker tracked 
                him down in 1976 (the revelation produced quite a stir in animation 
                circles....twenty years later the story was lampooned on an episode 
                of "The Simpsons").  For the first 
                time a studio produced what may be considered true art, but in 
                doing so took the credit usually given to the artist.  Hands Down 
                the most influential studio (from an artistic as well as a commercial 
                standpoint) in the history of animation is the Walt Disney Studio, 
                which exploded onto the scene in 1928 with Mickey Mouse in "Steamboat 
                Willie" and continued to dominate the field to this very 
                day. It is at Disney that we see the studio system's best and 
                worst effects on the development of animation as an art form.  Without Disney's 
                streamlined organization of talent and creative collaboration 
                the animated cartoon could never have advanced as rapidly or as 
                beautifully as it has....yet, as at the Bray and Sullivan studios, 
                in the process many of the men responsible for the studio's achievements 
                remain anonymous and forgotten. Had Disney animators Vladimir 
                Tytla and Freddie Moore been alive during the renaissance their 
                names might well have been numbered among Da Vinci and Michelangelo. 
                For all their accomplishments, however, they remain totally eclipsed 
                by the titanic figure of Walt Disney.  Walt Disney's 
                first important contribution to animation was to move his studio 
                to Hollywood in 1923. Los Angeles had become the center of live-action 
                filmmaking, but the animation industry remained rooted in New 
                York (with a few studios scattered throughout the Midwest, like 
                Disney's). Accompanying him on his move from Kansas City were 
                Hugh Harman and Rudy Ising, who would eventually found the Warner 
                Bros. and MGM animation houses. These three studios were to become 
                the leaders of the animation industry. Disney's decision to move 
                to California was a pivotal turning point in the development of 
                animation as a business.  Disney Studio's 
                artistic achievements derived from a sort of symbiotic relationship 
                between Walt and his employees. Like other studio heads, Walt 
                received all the public attention and praise for the studio's 
                work, but unlike many of his fellow producers he was at least 
                partly responsible for the studio's accomplishments. He was certainly 
                a cinematic visionary, and can be justly credited for introducing 
                the latest innovations in sound and color.  Walt was the 
                one who steered cartoons away from the "rubber hose" 
                style of the silent era (dubbed thus because of the way characters 
                moved without regard to anatomy, as if all their limbs were rubber 
                hoses) and encouraged his artists to develop a realistic, naturalist 
                style of animation in the early 1930s. He was the moving force 
                behind such groundbreaking films as "Snow White and the Seven 
                Dwarfs" (1937), the first full-length animated feature, and "Pinocchio" 
                (1940), a film whose intricate levels of technical brilliance 
                many animators feel has never been surpassed. But it was up to 
                the studio artists to make Disney's ideas reality.  It was Freddie 
                Moore who led the movement towards realistic motion in cartoons 
                with his re-definition of Mickey Mouse in such films as "The 
                Band Concert" (1935). Disney features like "Lady and 
                the Tramp" (1955) and "The Jungle Book" (1967) 
                could never have succeeded without the polished character animation 
                of Ollie Johnston, Frank Thomas, Eric Larson, and others. Vladimir 
                Tytla's rendering of the demon Chernabog in the Night on Bald 
                Mountain sequence of "Fantasia" (1940) might well be 
                the greatest work of animation ever. These extraordinarily talented 
                men, in alliance with the vision of their leader, accomplished 
                what Winsor McCay had deemed impossible: high art in a studio 
                setting.  The downside 
                to all this was of course, once again, the studio head received 
                all the recognition for his artist's work. In Disney's case, however, 
                it doesn't seem to be attributable to greed on the executive's 
                part. Walt certainly didn't mind all the attention, but he seems 
                to have recognized his artist's importance to his success. Yet 
                to this day the Disney staff remain unknown to the public at large 
                (do you know that David Hand directed "Snow White"?). 
                It seems to be an unfortunate side effect in the development of 
                animation studios that individual contributions to the medium 
                should go uncredited.  The men behind 
                Warner Bros. cartoon juggernaut "Looney Tunes" and "Merrie 
                Melodies" have managed to beat the odds and achieve a degree 
                of prominence in the public eye. Then again, maybe that's because 
                they have such unusual and distinct monikers like Friz Freleng, 
                Tex Avery, and Chuck Jones. But to claim thus would be to belittle 
                their accomplishments, and for once in the history of animation's 
                Golden Age the names of the artists outshine the name of the producer.  "Looney 
                Tunes" began in 1930 when Disney vets Hugh Harman and Rudy 
                Ising teamed with producer Leon Schlesinger to make cartoons, 
                to be distributed by Warner Bros. Three years later Harman and 
                Ising left to form the MGM cartoon studio, and Schlesinger and 
                his artists continued on their own. Unlike other studio heads 
                who craved the limelight, Schlesinger (and his successor Eddie 
                Selzer) seems to have been concerned only with making money. He 
                left it to his directors and animators to meet the press, and 
                gave them complete artistic freedom at the office....so long as 
                it was under budget.  The Warners 
                artists used their creative freedom to take the medium in new 
                directions. Directors Tex Avery and Bob Clampett broke from the 
                Disney tradition that the other studios had begun to mimic and 
                imbibed their films with highly exaggerated slapstick comedy. 
                In Avery's "Porky's Duck Hunt" (the first appearance 
                of Daffy Duck, 1937) and Clampett's "Porky in Wackyland" 
                (1938), the characters appear at first to be of the naturalist 
                Disney school, but are constantly distorted beyond all rationality, 
                defying every law of physics for comedic effect. The other Warners 
                artists immediately picked up on the style, and eventually every 
                other studio, even Disney, adopted the method. Slapstick ultimately 
                proved to be the theatrical genre animation was best suited for.  Like 
                Disney, the Warner Bros. studio turned the assembly-line-art system 
                to their advantage and collaborated their talents to take the 
                art to a higher level. Nowhere is this better exlempified than 
                in the creation and development of Bugs Bunny, arguably the greatest 
                cartoon character ever. It took over 10 years and 30 films for 
                Bugs' personality to coalesce into the suave and wily comic hero 
                that he is today. During that period he was continually tweaked 
                by various directors and redesigned several times by different 
                animators, notably Bob McKimson. By 1950 Warners' three animation 
                units had reached a consensus as to who Bugs was and how he looked; 
                while each unit made it's own cartoons, it was the same Bugs Bunny 
                every time. Without the tandem talents of Jones, Freleng, et.al., 
                it is unlikely that Bugs would have been as fully fleshed-out 
                a character as he eventually became.  It was when 
                animation finally made the leap to television that the art truly 
                began to suffer for business's sake. The great Hollywood studios 
                of the 30s, 40s, and 50s had been manned by people genuinely interested 
                in making quality cinema. The denizens of the TV animation houses 
                of the 60s, 70s, and 80s only cared that the product was there 
                to market. The quality of writing was poor, and the animation 
                itself was often so limited it barely qualified as animation at 
                all. McCay's prophecy had finally come to pass.  Cartoons made 
                exclusively for television had been around since Jay Ward's "Crusader 
                Rabbit" in 1949, but production of TV animation didn't really 
                hit it's stride until about 1960, when most of the cinematic cartoon 
                studios had shut their doors. Bill Hanna and Joe Barbara, former 
                MGM directors and creators of Tom and Jerry, dominated the market 
                almost from it's inception and continued to do so through the 
                1970s.  Unfortunately, 
                Hanna and Barbara never understood that just because something 
                works once, that doesn't mean the same thing will work again and 
                again. In their 20 years together at MGM they never made anything 
                except Tom and Jerry cartoons. But at least Tom and Jerry had 
                been well animated and cleverly written.  The duo's 
                television hits are considerably lesser in quality (one gets the 
                feeling they succeeded merely because there was nothing better 
                on), and the myriad self-imitations of every successful show they 
                had were downright abysmal. Despite it's flat, one-dimensional 
                characters and campy, formulatic stories, "Scooby-Doo" 
                proved extremely popular in 1969, so Hanna-Barbara made "Speed 
                Buggy", "Jabber Jaw", and "The Clue Club", 
                which were all variations on the same characters and theme. "The 
                Flintstones" begat "The Jetsons", and "The 
                Smurfs" begat "The Snorks". It was a process that 
                stunted creativity, giving the artists even less of a chance to 
                infuse life into their work.  Other TV cartoon 
                studios like Filmation and DIC proved little better or even worse 
                than Hanna-Barbara. Desperate to conquer as much air time as possible, 
                the studios churned out series after series without any regard 
                to aesthetic. The situation improved in the second half of the 
                1980s when the two big studios of old, Disney and Warner Bros., 
                entered the market. Shows like Disney's "DuckTales" 
                (1986) and Warners' "Tiny Toon Adventures" (1989) were 
                considerably better than anything their competitors were producing. 
                Yet they still fell utterly short of the great cartoons made for 
                the movies in the first half of the century. The budget restraints 
                and hurried deadlines of the television industry simply prohibited 
                artists from crafting the kind of art their cinematic predecessors 
                achieved.  Finally 
                in the 1990s the artists in the television cartoon industry began 
                to figure out how to work effectively with the limitations of 
                the field. 1992 saw the debut of Warner Bros. "Batman: The 
                Animated Series." Despite the fact that the animation was 
                contracted to various Oriental studios (by the mid 80s the practice 
                was almost universal in television production....it continues 
                to be so today) the show's creators Bruce Timm, Paul Dini, Eric 
                Radomski, and others managed to infuse the series with a distinct 
                visual style. Combined with the deep characterizations and strong 
                stories, "Batman" was a first-rate cartoon. While they 
                did not attract as much publicity as Disney's theatrical department, 
                the Warner Bros. TV artists were just as important to the art 
                of animation, demonstrating that even a television cartoon series 
                was capable of artistic achievement.  Back on the 
                big screen the medium faced a different set of problems. Since 
                the advent of television people were no longer spending all day 
                at the movies, and short subjects were gradually dropped from 
                the billings. While animation never completely disappeared from 
                theaters, by the 1960s most studios had closed down; the ones 
                that didn't suffered from severe declines in quality. Only Disney 
                retained it's level of excellence, but Disney had ceased full-time 
                production of short subjects by the mid-50s, earlier than anyone 
                else. While there was the occasional Non-Disney animated feature, 
                no other studio was producing them on a regular basis. By the 
                1980s no studio was producing shorts full-time, and even the Disney 
                movies had lost their appeal.  The new generation 
                of Disney artists breathed life back into animation with films 
                like "Who Framed Roger Rabbit?" (1988) and "The 
                Little Mermaid" (1989). These well-crafted cartoons were 
                celebrations of animation's glory days, and the public proved 
                just as nostalgic as the artists themselves. The new Disney crew 
                proved that the studio system was still capable of turning out 
                great art. In fact, the major flaw of the studio system, lack 
                of artist recognition, dissipated. Gone were the producer-moguls 
                of old, and with no Walt Disney public attention finally shifted 
                to the artists themselves. While not exactly household names, 
                directors John Musker and Ron Clements and animators like Glen 
                Keane and Andreas Deja certainly received more press than Disney 
                vets like Milt Kahl or Wolfgang Reitherman did in their heyday.  It was inevitable, 
                in spite of Winsor McCay's warnings, that animation would become 
                a "trade" in the form of the studio system. The complexities 
                of bringing moving drawings to life on the screen are too time-consuming 
                and too expensive for it to have developed otherwise. Fortunately, 
                through the years there have been many individuals working in 
                the field who have been careful not to let business logistics 
                overwhelm the artistic potential of the medium. The collective 
                nature of the studio may prevent the artists from receiving the 
                amount of praise an artist working solo garners, but the art attained 
                is no less great. As long as there are creative men and women 
                behind the drawing desk, the animated cartoon will continue to 
                be the best of both worlds: a trade and an art.  --  In 1999, 
                Michael Crandol entered this essay into a contest sponsored by 
                Joe & Vicki Tracy's Animation History Website where he won 
                first place and a limited edition signed copy of The Illusion 
                of Life.   > access 
                a printable version of this feature . > return to 
                Features main page . > return to front 
                page .                                                                                          Front 
          Page - News 
          Archives - dFX 
          Newsletter  -  Interviews - Features - Columns - Reviews - Forums  For 
          Fun - Artists - Maquettes - Movie 
          Sites -  Movie 
          Trailers - Forum 
          Insights - Special 
          Reports  About 
          dFX - Press 
          Room - DVD 
          Store - Book 
          Store  - Music 
          Store - Poster 
          Store - Cool 
          Items Store    All content, articles, and images on the
          Digital  Media FX Website are ©Copyright 2000 - 2008 by Joe Tracy  or 
          the indicated copyright holder. No content, images, or design elements 
          may be published, republished, rewritten, broadcast or redistributed without 
          the expressed written consent of Digital Media FX and Joe Tracy.  Webmasters 
          - Please Link to Digital Media FX http://www.digitalmediafx.com  Digital 
          Media FX is a leading provider of animation news, industry information, 
          animated movie announcements, 3D CGI production features, animator interviews, and 
          visual effects coverage.   Digital 
          Media FX Online Privacy Statement  Online
                Dating  | Reference
                Material    #^$               Richard's    Animated  Divots (diversions on various topics)         Chronology of animated movies, television programs, and short cartoons from around the world     Information about the staffs and casts of Japanese animated television programs     Filmographies of significant animators, directors, and studios     List of books and journals with animation information     Animation resources on the Internet     Find particular animated films, television shows, and production personnel in the Animated Divots pages...     Announcements of changes in the Animated Divots pages, animation reviews, comments on cartoons ...     Old announcements of changes in the Animated Divots pages...     A few brief notes on the creator of this site (designed for my fellow insomniacs).          This website was last updated: June 8, 2013       Comments to: Richard Llewellyn Copyright © 2013 Richard Llewellyn. All rights reserved.     #^$       cartoons, animation, comic strips and 
      puppets in the UK          HOME   THE HOUND british toon news & chatter   MOVIE TOONS animated films & shorts   TV TOONS animated series   TOON MAKERS animation studios & people   IT'S A PUPPET! string, hand & finger puppets   COMICS characters, strips & comic books   TOON GODS British animators & illustrators    RESOURCES      FLEETWAY ST.   GENTLEMAN  BRIGGS   BUNTY'S BOOTY   CRACKING   COLLECTIBLES   _______________     _______________   ABOUT ME  CONTACT ME  DISCLAIMER    _______________                   Thursday - 19 Apr            toon 
        news headlines  All the latest toon news from the UK!   older 
        news   interviews    giveaways    archive       Welcome to TOONHOUND , your starting point 
      for info on British cartoon, animation, comic strip and puppet creations 
      of the past, present and future ...   500+ 
      creations indexed!      News 
      and additions...           MINI 
        MOVIETOONS  Two from the hedgerow:   Winter 
        Story and Poppy's   Babies ...  14/08/13     TVTOONS  Creature 
        Comforts UK ... Creature Comforts USA ...  23/04/13     IT'S 
        A PUPPET!  Bentine's Bumblies ...  15/04/13     TVTOONS   Na 
        na-na na-na na na na !  13/04/13     TVTOONS  Sarah 
        and Duck - Quack ! 08/04/13   THE 
        HOUND    An 
        adventure with Oscar ...  10//01/13         THE 
        HOUND    One 
        man and his Snowdog ...  03//01/13    THE 
        HOUND    A 
        Matter of Loaf and Detail ...  27/12/12    THE 
        HOUND    Dough 
        no - Piella's back!...  20/12/12     THE 
        HOUND   And 
        the BAFTA winners are...  26/11/12    THE 
        HOUND    The  nominees are ...  27/10/12    THE 
        HOUND   A Dandy exhibition ...  24/10/12    THE 
        HOUND    Calamity 
        Island ahoy! ...  01/10/12                 The 
        indexes...   These ever-growing indexes identify and credit the creators 
        of as many British cartoons, animations, comics and puppets as 
        you care to name...         Animated British tv series of the past, present and future. 240 series are currently indexed , 
      and  cross-referenced ...   51 British features and 57 specials  and shorts in 
      two separate guides, with a third in development...    Identifying the various studios, companies and individuals who create all these toons...    It's not a cartoon, or a comic character, so it's a puppet. 47 string, hand and finger puppet characters and series are here ...   British comic characters, strips, and comic books...   The Hound dons halo and wings to praise our British toon heroes...           Toonhound 
      presents...   Looking for something more substantial? - Hungry for more 
      toon info? Check out Toonhound's quartet of sub-sites and guides...        FLEETWAY 
      ST. An expanding index of strips from Whizzer & Chips, Whoopee!, Krazy, and the rest of Fleetway's fun British comics - 130 strips are now indexed on these pages...    BUNTY'S 
      BOOTY  Exploring the licensing side of hit Brit. film Chicken Run...    GENTLEMAN 
      BRIGGS  A biography, bibliography and filmography for author Raymond Briggs, the creator of Fungus the Bogeyman and The Snowman...   CRACKING 
      COLLECTIBLES Doing the same now for Nick Park's Wallace & Gromit...                 "The depth of information on 
        this regularly updated site is incredible..." - TheGuardian.co.uk             all 
        characters © their respective creators and licensees / F2013                        #^$ 1 - 10 of 16  Next 6 > :: JOIN ::  Forum  :: Info :: Next Ring                                           Login  Signup              Magical Girls Anime Ring    Listed in: Home > Entertainment & Arts > Comics and Animation > Anime Manager:  njjimf  njjimf's profile  Does your anime homepage contain any magical girls like Sailor Moon, Magic Knight Rayearth, Saint Tail, Fushigi Yuugi, Cutey Honey, etc...? If yes, then  join the Magical Girls Anime Ring, NOW! ~^^~
 Want your site featured in this ring?  For $ 1.00 per month, we will feature your site in this ring. This will include a "featured site" link on the ring navigation bar that will take visitors directly to your site. Click on the "Featured Sites" link below for details and to apply. Sites MUST contain content appropriate for this ring topic.  This ring is limited to one Featured Site at a time!!! This is our Magical Girls Anime Ring hubpage.  We have 16 carefully chosen sites for you to choose from below.  We hope you'll visit each one!          Sponsored Links           The Shops at WebRing Buy, Sell, Auction, Trade No Fees thru 2013!                  Approved Member Sites           Prayers From a Mystical Relm Preview  — Go — Flag    this site is devoted to my love of the girls that are Rayearth. You will be able to see many images(including superdeformed and animated), hear several midis, and read about your favorite characters of MKR. Don't forget to look here for your MKR computer goodies and info on where to pu          Start a new discussion or ask this community a question       Processing   Your post has been processed.  Refresh the page to view. You can get feedback if you sign in or sign up with WebRing!    Start a New Thread       Image:       Link:  Enter URL of reference site (optional)  Tags:  Enter 1-3 words that capture the topic of your post - we'll post it to the right community area  Subject:                       Magical Girl Pretty Sammy! Preview  — Go — Flag    A site all about Pretty Sammy!  Including characters, music, Episode summaries, and the like.            Lovelyangel :: Sweety :: Preview  — Go — Flag    Magical Girls Anime including Tokyo Mew Mew, Saint Tail, Card Captor Sakura, Pelsia, Magical Angel Sweet Mint, Miracle Girls, and more~!!!!!!!                    Shadow Lady Preview  — Go — Flag    Shadow lady, the magical girl, Aimee can change in to a Shadow girl with a magic eyes-shadow            Dream SaGa Preview  — Go — Flag    Mystic Lady Tisis of Chateau Aguille will lead your through her world of The Dream SaGa and Chateau Aguille of Orlouge.            CereCere's KawaiiKawaii Candy Shoppe Preview  — Go — Flag    Visit CereCere's Candy Shoppe!  The Largest Image Archieve of the pink hair QUARLET of Sailor Moon SuperS!            The PQ Angels Intro & Info Site Preview  — Go — Flag    PQ Angels is a rare manga series by Naoko Takeuchi (creator of Bishoujo Senshi Sailor Moon) about two alien girls who come to Earth and the boy one of them falls for during her first day on the planet. This story was left unfinished after only 4 chapters were published in Nakayoshi magazine. This site provides information and lots of pictures of the characters in "PQ Angels" plus profiles of the main characters.            Usagi-chan's SM Page Preview  — Go — Flag    It gives the differences between Sailor Moon Manga, and gives a glimpse of Naoko's new manga, PQ Angels.            The Crystal Temple Preview  — Go — Flag    The Crystal Temple is an alternate reality Sailor Moon role playing game.  At the site you can join the rp, read old posts, and view the profiles of current members ^_^            index.html Preview  — Go — Flag    My fansite dedicated to the best of girl's anime and manga.                         Popular | The Shops at WebRing | Blogs | Webspace | Discuss   Family & Home | Games & Gaming | Music | Pets | Politics | Religion   Art | Literature | Computers | Entertainment | Fitness | Hobbies & Crafts | Science | Sports & Rec | Travel   Business | Cultural | Education | Food | Regional | Relationships    Contact Us | Copyright © 2001-2016 WebRing®, Inc.  Terms of Service - Help - Privacy Policy              Save              #^$    Gundam  5 Star Stories  Super Robot Wars  Battletech  COMPLETE LIST   anime manga science-fiction at Gears Online  mecha from anime and manga        In The News  Check out the News Page to see what’s happening online.    CAUTION - Super Robots - View Broadly   You know Super-Robots are strong and powerful but that is not enough to be one of them. Super-Robots rank among the brave, just and heartful ones, sharing an ideal of a world at peace.    Hello, and welcome to Gears Online! This site is dedicated to the many wonderful machines seen in Japanese science-fiction, especially giant robots. As this site develops I’ll be working on bringing you more images and information from the archives. It’s my hope you will see something here you’ve never seen before and leave with a sense of inspiration. Whether you like Macross , Gundam , Five Star Stories or other science-fiction anime/manga you’re sure to find something interesting here. See our complete list of mecha anime/manga series .  The image above was created by Katoki Hajime and is © Studio Sunrise, Bandai and Banpresto  Greeting in Thai  Affiliated Sites   GEARS Online is a registered trademark of GEARS International Group.  This Website is © GEARS International Group.    Mecha Titles  Forums  GearsBlog  Updates   Fandom   News  Designers  Links     About Gears   About Gears  FAQ  About the Editor    Contact Us     Site Updates  Oct 18 5 Star Stories Jul 21 Dirty Pair Dec 10 Mospeada       #^$                                              Main   News  News Archives  Features    Mecha   Code Geass  Dougram  Dragonar  Dragon's Heaven  Dunbine  Eureka Seven  Galient  Gundam  L.Gaim  Macross  Megazone 23  Mospeada  Patlabor  SPT Layzner  Super Robot Wars  Vifam  VOTOMS  Zone of the Enders    Anime   A - L   Aim for the Top!  Big O  Blue Gender  Brave Saga  Broken Blade  Code Geass  Dunbine  Escaflowne  Eureka Seven  Fafner  FLCL  Full Metal Panic!  Gasaraki  Gundam  Gurren-Lagann  Ideon  King Gainer  L.Gaim    M - Z   Macross  Megazone 23  Mospeada  Nadesico  Orguss  Patlabor  Planetes  RahXephon  Rayearth  SPT Layzner  Star Driver  Super Robot Wars  Tekkaman Blade  Time of Eve  Trigun  VOTOMS  Zambot 3  Zone of the Enders      Print   Gundam  Planetes    Social   Chaos Theater   Twitter    Gundamn!   Twitter  YouTube    MAHQ   Facebook  Twitter      Podcasts   Chaos Theater  Gundamn!  Laplace’s Box   Forum Search                     04.14.18 - Chaotic Ogre by Chris 2:12 P.M.    Today's update is once again about Build Divers , featuring a review for episode 2 , plus updates to the mecha section.        04.07.18 - Welcome to GBN by Chris 8:54 A.M.    Gundam Build Divers is here, and I have a review for episode 1 , plus some updates for the show's mecha section.        04.02.18 - Point of Origin by Chris 9:11 P.M.    Today's update features new Burke's style expanded profiles for Gundam: The Origin , with lineart and data courtesy of Deacon Blues.    -The following suit is in the expanded format:    MW-01 Mobile Worker Model 01 Colony Coating Type    -The following vehicles are now in expanded format:    Chibe class  Columbus class  Lunar Line Ship  Magellan class  Papua class  Pizarro class  Salamis class        04.01.18 - Becoming legal by Chris 10:20 A.M.    It's that time of year again. MAHQ has now been in existence long enough that if it were a person, it could legally vote. We're still here after 18 years and not going anywhere. It's typical to have some update to mark the anniversary, so here's what we have today:    -A review for the ONA Twilight AXIS .  Since this review will probably generate some comments, yes, you read the score correctly. Yes, I think it's that bad, and yes, that's my first time in 18 years awarding that score.    -Arshad has reviews for episodes 26-30 of Da-Garn .    -There is a substantial amount of new lineart for G Gundam , Gundam X and MSV , plus MSV -style watercolor lineart for many Mobile Suit Gundam units.    It's also typical to lay out plans for the upcoming year, so I'll briefly do that as well. I didn't meet all of my goals from last year, including completing Macross Delta reviews, so I'll be focusing on that. I'll also be reviewing Gundam Build Divers as it airs, starting this week. Finally, I expect to do more manga reviews this year, since that area has been long neglected.    And as I usually do at some point in these posts, on behalf of myself and Dale, I'd like to thank everyone who has supported us over the last 18 years and continues to do so.        03.09.18 - Clash at Loum by Chris 5:54 P.M.    The OVA adaptation of Gundam: The Origin is nearly complete, so today's update focuses on catching up with a review for episode 5 .        03.03.18 - Lineart things by Chris 6:58 P.M.    Similar to the last update, this one includes near total lineart replacement for Gundam 0083 , Gundam Wing , Endless Waltz , G-UNIT and Turn A Gundam . Watch for more updates along this line soon.        02.26.18 - New lineart by Chris 8:11 A.M.    The main part of today's update is a near total lineart replacement for the profiles in Mobile Suit Gundam , Zeta Gundam and Gundam ZZ . Also, there are new profiles in Burke's expanded format, with lineart and data courtesy of Deacon Blues. They are:    Barracuda  Type 61 Tank Early Model        02.15.18 - Winners Forever by Chris 4:22 P.M.    There are several elements in today's update. First, the following suits are now in Burke's expanded profile format, with lineart and data courtesy of Deacon Blues:    AMS-123X Varguil  MSK-008R Rick Dijeh  MSM-04 Acguy Heavy Firepower Type  MSZ-010A1 Theta Plus    Next up is a near complete lineart replacement for the Victory Gundam section. All the vehicles from that series are also in Burke's expanded format, but I feel too lazy to link them, so just follow the link above.        02.02.18 - Dive into Gunpla, part 2 by Chris 1:48 P.M.    In a rare second update on the same day, I've posted my review for the prologue of Gundam Build Divers . I also have reviews for episodes 4-5 of Battlogue , which completes that series.        02.02.18 - Dive into Gunpla by Chris 7:57 A.M.    If you had not heard the news yet, Sunrise  has announced the forthcoming spring TV debut of the Gundam Build Divers series. As usual, I will be covering the series and have set up corresponding mecha and anime sections. Expect a review soon for the prologue, which is streaming now.        02.01.18 - Save the G by Chris 12:53 P.M.    In what is likely to be the last time that G-Saviour is mentioned on MAHQ's front page, the following suits/armor are now in Burke's expanded format:    CAMS-13 MS-Rai  CAMW-13 MW-Rai  CCMS-03 Bugu  G-Saviour Origin  G-Saviour Space Mode  G-Saviour Terrain Mode  I-Saviour Illusion  MMS-DS209 Guppy  RGM-196 Freedom  ZMT-A03G Galicson    The following vehicles are also in Burke's expanded format:  MS Carrier  Nimbus  Shuttle  Ulysses        01.30.18 - Beast of Possibility by Chris 7:59 A.M.    In today's update, the following vehicles are now available in Burke's expanded format:    Dogosse Giar class ( General Revil )  Fat Uncle Custom  Garencieres  Klimt  Salamis class (early)  Shuttle  Type 94 Base Jabber  Working Space Boat        01.29.18 - Eternal Wind by Chris 7:36 A.M.    For the first part of today's update, there are new sections for Far East Japan , MS Battlefield Record and the Climax U.C. manga . Next, the following profiles are now in Burke's expanded format:    Ark class  Armored Buggy A  Armored Buggy B  Armored Truck  Child Bug  Missile Armored Car  Motorcycle  Paint Vehicle  Ra Cailum class ( Ra Gustar )  Wired Missile Car  Zamouth Garr class  Zamouth Giri class  Zamouth Jeth class  Zamouth Nada class        01.26.18 - God of the Gravity Front by Chris 7:54 A.M.    Insert comment about continued sameness of updates. The following vehicles are now in Burke's expanded format:    B.M.C. Z78/2 Motorcycle  Cargo Truck  Heavy Fork class  M61A5 Tank  M72 Lakota  Magella Eins  PVN.3/2 Sauropelta  Russel 11/2 Zebu        01.25.18 - 10 Years After by Chris 7:54 A.M.    Yep, today is more of the same. The following vehicles are now in Burke's expanded format:    Assault Landing Ship  Dora  FFB-7Bst Jet Core Booster II   Gunship Heli  Hover Cargo Truck  Jeep  Jungle Boat  Space Transport Ship  Zanzibar class ( Kerguelen )        01.24.18 - Men of Destiny by Chris 7:35 A.M.    For the first part of today's update, there is new lineart for some vehicles from The Origin OVA , courtesy of Deacon Blues. The rest of the update is in line with previous ones.    The following suit is now in Burke's expanded format:    YMS-09R-2 Prototype Rick Dom Zwei    The following vehicles are now in Burke's expanded format:    Birmingham class  Colony Corporation Ship  Columbus class (modified)  Command Vehicle  FF-XII Core Fighter II  FF-XIIFb Core Fighter IIFb  Komusai II  Magellan class (modified)  MS Landing Ship  Musai class (late production type)  Patrol Vessel  Pegasus class ( Troy Horse )  Salamis class (modified)  Zanzibar II class        01.18.18 - 2018 Continues by Chris 5:15 P.M.    This update is along the same lines as the previous few. First up, there's a new section for the manga Missing Link .    The following vehicles are now in Burke's expanded format:    Arcana class  Eight-Wheeled Armored Vehicle  FF-3F Saberfish  FF-X7-Bst-II Core Booster II Intercept Type  FXA-08R-X1 Proto Mega Rider  GG Gas Infusion Vessel  Hackman  HLV  HOTOL  Jotunheim  Lepanto class  M62 Four-Wheeled Armored Vehicle  M62 Security Enforcement Armored Bus  Magellan class ( Ananke )  Minesweeping Boat  Mobile Heavy Mortar  Musai class (early production type)  Musai class ( Valkyrie )  Muspelheim  Observation Boat  PVN.44/1 Weasel  Tarara  Transport Ship  Type 61 Tank Model A2  Tyson  Vollhog    The following mobile suits are now in Burke's expanded format:    MS-06S Reconnaissance Zaku II  MS-09SS Dowas Custom  MS-14 Herbert Von Kuspen's Gelgoog  MS-21D1 Dra-C Custom (Heavy Weapons Type)  MSA-005X-1 Methuss X-1  MSA-005X-2 Methuss X-2  MW-01 Mobile Worker Model 01  RGM-79SP GM Sniper II (Titans Spec)  RX-80PR-4 Pale Rider DII (Titans Spec)  YMS-07A-0 Prototype Gouf (Mobility Demonstrator)  YMS-07B-0 Prototype Gouf (Tactical Demonstrator)        01.06.18 - 2018 Begins by Chris 12:45 P.M.    It's a new year, and this is the first MAHQ update of 2018. First up, some new lineart for units in Gundam: The Origin MSD , courtesy of Deacon Blues. The rest of the update is in line with other recent updates.    The following vehicles are now in Burke's expanded format:    Big Gun  Burstliner  Columbus class ( Beehive )  Corvette Booster  Guncarry  Lightliner  Papua class ( Dried Fish )  Scoot  Skiure    The following mobile suits are now in Burke's expanded format:    MS-05 Zaku I (Thunderbolt Sector)  MS-06 Zaku II (Thunderbolt Sector)  MS-06CK Zaku Half Cannon  MS-06R Zaku II High Mobility Type "Psycho Zaku"  RB-79[M] Ball Marine Type  RGM-79C[G] GM Ground Type-C  RGM-79/GH Gundam Head  RGM-79[M] GM Marine Type  RX-75 Guncannon  RX-77AQ Guncannon Aqua  RX-78AL Atlas Gundam  RX-79[GS} Gundam Ground Type-S  SRf-06 Dahle  YMS-06K Zaku Cannon Test Type      Original content ©2000 to 2018
by Accidental Pilot, Inc. Privacy Policy .  Original graphics ©2009 to 2018
by Design Forward Creative                                                                        #^$  Mechanized Propulsion Systems, Incorporated    Official Corporate Website Ver 6.2  Read the section relevant to your informational needs to find out about the world's first industrial bipedal vehicle research, development, and manufacturing firm. Follow provided links to download individual files, design details, photographs, news, press releases, or whole packets of public relations materials.       Privacy     Introduction Products Media, PR       Downloads Contact History, News       Development Photography Interning       Forum Team Facility        #^$                            undefined   Enter To Our Main Page Now!  Our Top Affiliate  Our Image Gallery                  #^$          Mecha General>  Mecha Information  Mecha  Mecha Images  Mecha Designers  Mecha Models  Military Mecha   Complete Coverage>  Zone of Enders  Front Mission 3  Xenogears  Big O    Minor Coverage>  Gundam   Patlabor  Macross  Virtual On  Evangelion  Front Mission  Robotech  ZOE Idolo 2167  Brahma Force  Xenosaga  Pilot Canidate  Gun Griffin Blaze  Bush Murakuro  Vanguard Bandits  Five Star Stories  Mechasmith Run=Dim  Tech Romancer  Metal Gear Sold  Shogo R.A.D.  Phantom Crash  Mech Assault  Murakumo  Contra  Mechwarrior  BubbleGum Crisis  Mekton  Teknoman    Features>   Gallery  Message Boards  Stuff  Listing of Mecha  WebRing  News Archive  Directory of Mecha  The Staff  Contact      Affiliates  Megadeus  Anime Shift  GW Tournament  Mecha Games  Extreme GW  XenoSaga Haven  Solnoid C.I.  Gundam Wing Fans  Church of Zeta  QC's Anime Studio  Blue Fire        Submit Mecha ID   Mecha ID>  Mech Armored Core Mobile Suit MAWV Gear Product Noid Megadeuce RAD Wanzer Orbital Frame Guymelfe BRAHMA __________________________________________       News:  New Mecha> Below are a number of new mecha games of which I have not listed any info on. If you would like to make a site deticated to one of them or if you know of a site that already gives info on them please let me know so I can update. Thanks! Robot X Robot, Getter Robot Wars, Assault Suits Valken 2, The Mechsmith Run=Dim, Super Robot Wars Alpha.  Live Action Gundam Movie  Well you know how much we all want a live action Gundam movie, but now that dream might not be to far off thanks to our nice friends in Japan decided make actual size Mecha to help encourage the creaters of Gundam to start the production. Yes I do have pictures. Armored Core MoH  For all of you that got those early versions of A.C. MoH with that annoying '2 player mode'
broken radar, well there's actualy a way to fix it....   Site:   Updates-3/9/04 New layout and background  Anouncements-  Please let me know of any new mecha games or animes I don't have listed on my site cause I know I'm missing alot.  Mecha Seal-  If you have a mecha related website let one of the ROM staff members analize it and if it has the right juice we'll award you with the Mecha Seal.  Chat- ROM has a chatroom. You must have AOL to chat though. Go to Find a chat, then look under arts and entertainment, created by aol members, and its called 'Mecha Animes Games'. Help keep the chat always going.   Shorts: 01- There was a reference to ZOE in MGS2. The letters Z.O.E. were written on one of those boxes you hide under.   Affiliates: Wana be a ROM affiliate? Just post this banner below on your site and I'll post your banner right here.
Email me if your interested. Here's a link to Me:   Check out the message boards, converse about Mecha Animes, Video Games, or Even real Mecha like the ones being made by MPS. Click Here to enter the Message Boards.     Realm of Mecha: The Mecha Anime and Video Game Resource. http://www.angelfire.com/realm/ofmechs/center.html  Disclaimer: Realm of Mecha(c) 2004 PDD(c) Phoenix Down Designs. www.phoenixdowndesigns.com
Realm of Mecha is a non-profit webpage meant only for informational and entertainment purposes. All images and names are property of their original owners.    #^$ 1 - 8 of 8 :: JOIN ::  Forum  :: Info :: Next Ring                                           Login  Signup              Robot Anime WebRing    Listed in: Home > Entertainment & Arts > Comics and Animation > Anime Manager:  animesurf  animesurf's profile  A collection of websites bringing together all the best robot websites in cartoon and Japanese Anime history.

Want your site featured in this ring? 
 
For $ 3.00 per month, we will feature your site in this ring. This will include a "featured site" link on the ring navigation bar that will take visitors directly to your site. Click on the "Featured Sites" link below for details and to apply. Sites MUST contain content appropriate for this ring topic.
 
This ring is limited to one Featured Site at a time!!! This is our Robot Anime hubpage.  We have 8 carefully chosen sites for you to choose from below.  We hope you'll visit each one!          Sponsored Links           The Shops at WebRing Buy, Sell, Auction, Trade No Fees thru 2013!                  Approved Member Sites           Giaguar Home Page Preview  — Go — Flag    Manga, anime e comics riproposti nella mia personale interpretazione          Start a new discussion or ask this community a question       Processing   Your post has been processed.  Refresh the page to view. You can get feedback if you sign in or sign up with WebRing!    Start a New Thread       Image:       Link:  Enter URL of reference site (optional)  Tags:  Enter 1-3 words that capture the topic of your post - we'll post it to the right community area  Subject:                       Spinicci Giacomo Home Of 2D Preview  — Go — Flag    Tanti robot dei cartoni animati più belli della nostra infanzia realizzati  con il Pain di Windows            Mazinger Z Preview  — Go — Flag    Dedicated to one of my biggest heroes as well as one of the biggest heroes for many children that grew up in the 80's — MAZINGER Z!!!                    The Tranzor Z Headquarters Preview  — Go — Flag    My Everything you ever wanted to know about Tranzor Z page. I also sell the epiosdes. Enjoy!            art's collectibles Preview  — Go — Flag    Trading or selling toys (including Japanese robots), fast food toys, non-sports and basketball cards.            Go Nagai GO Preview  — Go — Flag    Questo sito e' dedicato al geniale creatore di Manga ed Anime Giapponesi come Ufo Robot Goldrake, Mazinga Z, Grande Mazinga e Jeeg Robot d'acciaio ed intende presentare una selezione dei suoi lavori piu' famosi.            Transformers: The Movie Preview  — Go — Flag    This site has everything to do with Transformers: The Move and more! Theres pictures, movie clips, sound files, comic scans, and you can even download the actual SOUNDTRACK from TF:TM!!!            Animesurf Preview  — Go — Flag    Animesurf                         Popular | The Shops at WebRing | Blogs | Webspace | Discuss   Family & Home | Games & Gaming | Music | Pets | Politics | Religion   Art | Literature | Computers | Entertainment | Fitness | Hobbies & Crafts | Science | Sports & Rec | Travel   Business | Cultural | Education | Food | Regional | Relationships    Contact Us | Copyright © 2001-2016 WebRing®, Inc.  Terms of Service - Help - Privacy Policy                           #^$         I'm not sure why anyone still comes here - any content once associated with this site can now be reached through koigokoro.net , my neglected collective.  My most active site is Happy Phantom , my winamp skin archive; for anything else, check the collective.      #^$              Sign In  Sign-Up               Welcome!    Close   Would you like to make this site your homepage? It's fast and easy...     Yes, Please make this my home page!    No Thanks    Don't show this to me again.    Close          You have
just reached  Animen:
The Bishounen Universe  A shrine
dedicated to our favourite men in the world of anime & manga...  And to
those who created them:  We salute
you!  Now get
your drool bags ready as we begin the journey of this star-studded Universe.        This Guys
of Rurouni Kenshin Webring Site  is proudly
owned by Little Raptor and Baby
Elephant   • Next
Page • Skip
It • Previous • Next
Five   info .       This Guys
of Anime Web Ring   site is
happily owned by Little Raptor .and Baby Elephant           [ Next
Page ]  [ Skip
It ]  [ Previous ] 
[ Next
Five ]      Want to
join the ring? Click here for info .              This site
is owned by that genki --Little
Raptor-- and healthy Baby
Elephant  [ prev5 : next5 : random : list ]        This Yu
Yu Hakusho site is owned by Little
Raptor & Baby
Elephant   [ Previous
5 Sites | Previous | Next | Next
5 Sites | Random
Site | List
Sites ]              Hai! Do you realize that you've been here          FastCounter by LinkExchange   times ? Amazing!   And our other counter says otherwise...        Now you can enter
here!      DISCLAIMER:  The Shrine Keepers do not claim
ownership of the characters featured in this shrine. All anime and manga
images are used for entertainment purposes only. What we claim is that
we designed the layout and the ideas embedded within. Credits are found
on the links page. All the infos were written by the Baby
Elephant and the backgrounds were made by the Little
Raptor unless specified that some other talented species created it. 
^_^            #^$                       «-- Home o Images o Fan Art o Bios o Links o Contact --»                 #^$     My New Magic Shoppe!     Ladies and Gentlemen.  I, Professor Crane, Slave of Ms. Hime's whims of madness due to the fact that I had such a miniscule role in the inferior Batman Begins and am now reduced to this for food , am proud to introduce the newly REANIMATED MAGIC SHOPPE      I Love Robin's Chickies!.....and Kevin 11 makes wonderful lovers!        Updated 9/21/07-OMG!!! AVVVAAATAAAARRRRRRRR! Book 3 Starts today!  ARRGG! FAAANNNSSPPPASSSSMMMM! I love Summer Movie Season.  I also love chocolate cake. Gotta love the chocolate cake.  I wish Professor Crane would feed me some, but I don't think he will, being that he's you know, fictional and pretty nutty.  X.X  Anyway don't let his schpiel bother you.  I fed him gorditas.  Mmmmmm...gorditas. Anyway, been away for awhile.  Bleh. Anyway.  Have fun.     Why hello, I'm Batman.  No-Wait!  I mean I'm Wizard Howl!  I'm a playboy, but I really love this one girl.  So I'm spoken for.  I'll also be damned if that one girl is Katie Holmes.  No, my girl has a Brittishy accent.  I also turn into a bird.  Yeah.  A bird.  Its pretty badass too.  Too bad you probably won't see it as I'm being shafted by Disney.   Here is a link to the movie the studio I am interning for is releasing:  Tugger: The Jeep Who Wanted to Fly  the studio site is here: Genesis Orlando .  Their world premiere is coming up in Celebration, FL.  Free Admission on July 2! ^_^    *Sigh* ANGST.  I'm Ben Grimm, The Thing!  I'm this summer's obligatory angst mascot.  I have a shallow wife who leaves me and I wish I could turn invisible because I turn UGLY.  Blah.  Why does everyone else get cool powers and I turn into a hideous freak? *Sigh*  Angst.           Chibi Hime Sites    Believe It   Otaku No Date: A SoulTaker Site   UnReCoGnIzEd GeNiUs   Crimson Shadow  Devil In Disguise  Otaku No Date: A SoulTaker Site   Chibi Hime Shrines, Bio, Rants and Other Stuff     Who Is Chibi Hime?   Cliques and Awards!   Catholic Badass   Collateral-*NEW*   Forgotten Soldier   Shadow Blues   X-Y-NNY   Sweet Psychosis  Chibi Hime's Adoptions!  Earth Angel  Dirty Bastard!!   ~Shine~*NEW*   Rants 'N Such!   What makes Chibi Hime Scream?~ Now version 2.0:T3!   Titillating Polls to Excite The Senses!   Quizzes: Pointless fun!!   Bishonen of Interest        Welcome back, if you are still reading! This is my Magic Shoppe! a place where I build shrines to all my favorite Animated/video game/all time favorite characters!  Look around and have some fun!  Remember-I don't own any of the copyrighted characters here-fanfics are by me and belong to me- fan art is by others and belongs to them.  Leave a note in the GuestBook if you want to be really nice!  Thanks for stopping by my Magic Shoppe, The Self Proclaimed Pop Culture Diva, Chibi Hime Thanks you! DOn't let him dissuade you from moving onward into the vast, uncharted regions of my twisted psyche!     Wanna Know what's Scary?  I took a Final Fantasy VII Personality Test and I was..........   HOJO!!!!! EEEP!    Wanna Link me? Use one of these banners!  OR             Chibi Hime Presents: Today's Favorite:   Song:   Ready Steady Go!  from Fullmetal Alchemist  Movie: 90's Spider-Man Cartoons, I know its not really a movie, but it was my soap opera! Food: Spicy Ramen Cup Noodles! <((*_*))> Drink: Diet Pepsi Book: Phantom by Susan Kay (YOU WILL READ THIS BOOK NOW!) Bishonen: Vincent Valentine (As Always ^_^), With Boba Fett and Erik, The Phantom of the Opera (yes, he can be bishonen!)    I adopted Tso Lan Kitty from Spleef's Rare Finds.  Want a  kitty? Go here-                   View My Guestbook  Sign My Guestbook   Links To NonChibi Hime Pages!   + | I.love.the.dark.hand | ? | << | >>    I won an award from Animated Lust! Rated PG!  #^$                            undefined  Click ME to Enter! (PLEASE BE AWARE.....CURRENTLY UNDER MAJOR RECONSTRUCTION INSIDE)                      #^$                            undefined    Nini's Bishonen Dungeon       This page includes a lot of cute boys. If you don't like that kind of stuff you should leave right now. Otherwise feel free to enter.
This is a German page. So some of the stuff will be written in German. But I'll try my best to write as much as I can in English. Please don't be mad about me, if something is wrong ! ^.^ !
Please inform me about broken links!
Up since 20.01.2001          Enter here!         Email: Nini.Fl@t-online.de            #^$                            undefined    Liz's Anime Favorites... Is No More       Well, this is it.  To any people who have visited this site more than once, thanks for your support!  This was my first website, and I hated the layout and when I made it I basically sucked with HTML and everything.  So "Liz's Anime Favorites" doesn't exist anymore, *but* you can go to my other (better!) websites.    Please Visit My Other Websites ^_^   Orange Rose: An Arisugawa Juri fan Club  Bishoujo :: Bishounen  The Aquarium                 #^$                                     you have no frames...haha. sorry...that's mean, i know.  #^$                  and Welcome to Anime@Carleton (A@C), devoted to the exposure of Japanese animation "Anime" at Carleton University in Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.  The club is meant to be a medium through which students and the Anime community in Ottawa can share their love of Anime.  We hold weekly Anime showings, which encourage you to meet fellow Anime fans and Japanophiles.  Anyone can come out to our events from the simply curious, to the serious Anime fans.  We hope to see you at the showings.  Notice  This Saturday, April 21st we're going to show Gundam: Thunderbolt - Bandit Flower as the movie.  Please be advised that the film has mature and other heavy content.  News  April 15th, 2018  For yesterday’s movie and free showing period we showed,  Aura Battler Dunbine / Seisenshi Dunbine ep. 36 and 37 Hozuki no Reitetsu (2018) ep. 1 (14) Pop in Q Today's Menu for Emiya Family / Emiya-san Chi no Kyou no Gohan ep. 4  The next showing is this Saturday, April 21st in Paterson Hall (PA) 115 , directions to the room here .  Schedule A this week is,  1:30pm to 2:10pm: Setup 2:10pm to 3:00pm: Karakai Jouzu no Takagi-san ep. 5 and 6 3:00pm to 3:10pm: Break 3:10pm to 4:00pm: Princess Nine ep. 7 and 8 4:00pm to 4:10pm: Break 4:10pm to 5:00pm: Violet Evergarden ep. 5 and 6 5:00pm to 5:10pm: Break 5:10pm to 6:00pm: Kakegurui ep. 7 and 8 6:00pm to 7:30pm: Dinner Break 7:30pm to 11:00pm: Movie(s) and Free Showing  Notice:  This Saturday, April 21st we're going to show Gundam: Thunderbolt - Bandit Flower as the movie.  Please be advised that the film has mature and other heavy content.  April Club Dinner: Magical Idols and Obsessions  The Club Dinner: April Edition returns this month. On this month’s Club Dinner: Magical Idol Colin-kun appears to keep the dastardly plots of the nefarious Dr. C Mango at bay since Mahou Shoujo Sean-chan went off to the land of moon runes.  The international Magical Idol Colin-kun fan club is formed after Dave sees Colin-kun’s musical performance with Dave pledging lifelong devotion to his new idol.  Dave immediately starts to make Magical Idol Colin-kun vinyl records and merchandise to promote Colin-kun around the globe.  Still unable to get graphics cards at MSRP for his developing VR/AR system, Sean2 decides to create his own cryptocurrency, the MIC-coin.  Will Colin-kun become an international famous idol?  Will Dave take his devotion to Magical Idol Colin-kun to unhealthy levels?  Will Sean2’s MIC-coin become the hot new trending cryptocurrency?   If you'd like to attend, please send me a message ASAP . Also, state whether you’re okay with having your email put on the email list (the list is for club dinner planning and other club events).  Those already on the email list will have been sent an email.  Anime Movies  Notice: Dates/times may change or additional dates/times may be added. Check the Cineplex showtimes a day or two before.  Yu-Gi-Oh! The Movie  English dub April 25th, 28th, and 29th Cineplex Listing   We hope to see you at the weekly showings.  Craig Kaicho of A@C  April 8th, 2018  For yesterday’s movie and free showing period we showed,  Aura Battler Dunbine / Seisenshi Dunbine ep. 34 and 35 Galaxy Angel ep. 11 and 12 Macross Plus OVA ep. 3 and 4 (End) Martian Successor Nadesico / Kidou Senkan Nadesico ep. 4  The next showing is this Saturday, April 14th in Paterson Hall (PA) 115 , directions to the room here .  Schedule B this week is,  1:30pm to 2:10pm: Setup 2:10pm to 3:00pm: The Ancient Magus' Bride / Mahou Tsukai no Yome ep. 15 and 16 3:00pm to 3:10pm: Break 3:10pm to 4:40pm: Fafner: Heaven and Earth / Soukyuu no Fafner: Dead Aggressor - Heaven and Earth Movie 4:40pm to 4:50pm: Break 4:50pm to 5:40pm: After the Rain / Koi wa Ameagari no You ni ep. 3 and 4 5:40pm to 5:50pm: Break 5:50pm to 6:40pm: Blood Blockade Battlefront & Beyond / Kekkai Sensen & Beyond ep. 5 and 6 6:40pm to 7:30pm: Dinner Break 7:30pm to 11:00pm: Movie(s) and Free Showing  April Club Dinner: Magical Idols and Obsessions  The Club Dinner: April Edition returns this month. On this month’s Club Dinner: Magical Idol Colin-kun appears to keep the dastardly plots of the nefarious Dr. C Mango at bay since Mahou Shoujo Sean-chan went off to the land of moon runes.  The international Magical Idol Colin-kun fan club is formed after Dave sees Colin-kun’s musical performance with Dave pledging lifelong devotion to his new idol.  Dave immediately starts to make Magical Idol Colin-kun vinyl records and merchandise to promote Colin-kun around the globe.  Still unable to get graphics cards at MSRP for his developing VR/AR system, Sean2 decides to create his own cryptocurrency, the MIC-coin.  Will Colin-kun become an international famous idol?  Will Dave take his devotion to Magical Idol Colin-kun to unhealthy levels?  Will Sean2’s MIC-coin become the hot new trending cryptocurrency?   Planning for the April Club Dinner is underway.  If you'd like to attend, please send me a message . Also, state whether you’re okay with having your email put on the email list (the list is for club dinner planning and other club events).  Those already on the email list will have been sent an email.  Anime Movies  Notice: Dates/times may change or additional dates/times may be added. Check the Cineplex showtimes a day or two before.  Mary and The Witch’s Flower  Mary and The Witch’s Flower is in theatres until April 12th (it may be extended).  The movie is playing in Ottawa at Cineplex South Keys in English Dub .  Pretty Guardian Sailor Moon: The Musical - Le Mouvement Final  Japanese w/e.s.t. April 8th Trailer  Cineplex Listing   Yu-Gi-Oh! The Movie  English dub April 25th, 28th, and 29th Cineplex Listing   We hope to see you at the weekly showings.  Craig Kaicho of A@C                      Saturday, April 21st  1:30pm to 11:00pm in PA 115 [Sch. A] Saturday, April 28th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in PA 115 [Sch. B]  End of Winter-term Showings  Start of Summer Showings   Saturday, May 5th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, May 12th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, May 19th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, May 26th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, June 2nd  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, June 9th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, June 16th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, June 23rd  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, June 30th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, July 7th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, July 14th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, July 21st  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, July 28th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, August 4th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, August 11th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A] Saturday, August 18th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. B] Saturday, August 25th  1:30pm to 11:00pm in TBD [Sch. A]           Right Stuf's Stuf for Clubs  Anime Club Support Program     The opinions of Carleton University and CUSA are in no way reflected by those of Anime@Carleton or by any part of this website including it's Forums, Groups, and Social Media accounts. Site design and content, unless otherwise stated, © 2001-2017 Anime@Carleton. Characters, Images, and Logos are © their respective owners and distributors. All Rights Reserved.  #^$                    x News    x About    x Meetings    x Join    x Schedule    x Officers    x Committees    x Members    x Events    x Public Relations    x Meeting Archives    x Contact    x Site Map                  x What is Anime?    x What is Manga?    x Otaku Dictionary A-K    x Otaku Dictionary L-Z    x Subtitled and Dub    x Fansub    x Conventions    x Con Items Guide    x Links to Anime Sites    x Where is Bloomsburg?    x Local Anime Buying    x Local Manga Buying                 x Fan Art    x Fan Fiction    x Fan Plushie    x Fan Motivational Posters    x Club Pictures    x Convention Pictures              x Forum    x Facebook Page    x Twitter    x deviantART    x My Anime List                                                                    Welcome to the Bloomsburg University Manga and Anime Club (BUMAC) webpage. We hold free public showings of anime every Monday at 7:45 p.m. and Thursday at 6:30 p.m. in Bakeless Center Room 207. Please enjoy your stay and we hope to see you at the next meeting!  News      Spring Break 2018 March 11, 2018, 9:31 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        There will be no meetings on Monday March 12th, 2018 & Thursday 
  March 15th, 2018 during Spring Break. Our next meeting will be on 
Monday   March 19th, 2018. Have a good break 
everyone!             Setsucon Pictures 2018 February 4, 2018, 4:57 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        The Setsucon Pictures are now up in the Convention Pictures           
section. Direct Links: Setsucon 2018    
   Eric   Set A Thanks to Eric who    
provided 13 pictures.             First Meeting of the Spring Semester 2018 January 20, 2018, 1:14 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        Our first meeting of the semester will be held on Monday January 22nd,   2018 in Bakeless Center Room 207 at 7:45  p.m. Reminder  that if  evening classes are canceled, we  do not have club. If classes are not  canceled but the officers feel  that travel is unsafe, we will post on  the website or Facebook by 5:30  p.m. if we are going to have  club. Hope to see  you all on Monday!             MAGFest Pictures 2018 January 8, 2018, 3:39 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        The MAGFest Pictures are now up in the Convention Pictures           section. Direct Links: MAGFest 2018       Eric   Set A Thanks to Eric who    provided 55 pictures.             Happy Holidays! December 25, 2017, 9:55 am by Webmaster  Read More ...  Comments (0)        Happy Holidays from all your friends here at BUMAC! Have a    great     
holiday season!              No Meetings Winter Term December 18, 2017, 12:33 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        Please note that while Bloomsburg University is having a Winter Session/Term, BUMAC will not have meetings during this time.             Fall semester over, good luck with finals, spring semester December 10, 2017, 9:43 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        The BUMAC Fall semester is now over. Thank you to all those who attended   meetings. Good luck to everyone with finals. Our     first official meeting for the Spring semester and location are to be announced. Have a GREAT break and see you all in   spring! - BUMAC officer team             Final Meeting Fall 2017 December 7, 2017, 12:05 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        The final meeting of the Fall 2017 semester will be on Thursday December 7th, 2017. Hope to see you all there!             End of Fall Semester Schedule November 27, 2017, 6:36 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        Monday November 27th,  2017 Thursday November 30th,  2017 Monday December 4th,    2017 Thursday December 7th, 2017  - Final  meeting of the Fall    semester. See you in the Spring!             DerpyCon Pictures 2017 November 22, 2017, 10:55 pm by Webmaster   Comments (0)        The DerpyCon Pictures are now up in the Convention Pictures         
section. Direct Links: DerpyCon 2017  
     Eric   Set A Thanks to Eric who  
provided 29 pictures.         << Previous 1  2  3  4  5  6  7  8  9  10  11  12  13  14  15  16  17  18  19  20  21  22  23  24  25  26  27  28  29  30  31  32  33  34  35  36  37  38  39  40  41  42  43  44  45  46  47  48  49  50  51  52  53  54  55  56  57  58  59  60  61  62  63  64  65  66  67  68  69  70  71  Next >>         Comments, Questions, Problems? E-Mail Us.                 ×                         #^$    Brown Anime Society   Details | Library | Friends | Past Shows | RSS | Archive       Apr. 28, 2017 at  6:25pm with 1 note    For record keeping’s sake, I’ll update this again!  Last semester, we watched: Trigun (yay for the Anime Library!) and Showa Genroku Rakugo Shinju.  :) Wow, that time sure went fast.  Soon it will be time to hand this account over to the next president!       Oct. 2, 2016 at  2:51am    Right.  So, this semester, we voted to watch: Re: Zero -Starting Life in Another World- Mob Psycho 100 Serial Experiments Lain Of these, I’ve only seen Lain, which is going to be fun to watch again.  And I’m looking forward to seeing how the others turn out!  :3       2:29am with 1 note    So, uh, wow.  It’s been a while since this has been updated.  Although the substance of what we do really hasn’t changed!  Now that I have access to the account, maybe I’ll update with what we’re watching each week.  Or maybe I’ll just stick to e-mails.  Depends how much time I have, really. Anyway, this is a test post!  Hello tumblr!       Nov. 15, 2013 at  10:45pm    BAS Meeting 11/16   I apologize for the lack of updates but we are watching episodes 20 and 21 of Hyouka and 19,20 and 21 of Michiko and Hatchin.  We will also discuss what to do during the two weeks after we finish the shows and the club is still going on.       Sep. 19, 2013 at  10:21pm    Hello Everyone.  Hopefully our first meeting didn’t scare any of you off.  As per last week, we will be watching Hyouka and Michiko and Hatchin this semester.  These are two awesome shows so I look forward to seeing you all this Saturday.  Also, please email me your availability if you are interested in becoming an Anime Librarian! Saturday: 3 episodes Hyouka, 2 episodes Michiko and Hatchin       Sep. 14, 2013 at  10:01pm    First Meeting   Thanks to all who came to our first meeting.  I was out of town for the weekend.  These are the results for what we are watching this semester: Shin Sekai Yori: 14 Hyouka: 21 AOK: 11 Uchouten Kazoku: 12 Michiko and hatchin: 18 Jormangand: NULL POINTS Binbogami ga: 5 Upotte: NULL POINTS Sora no woto: 4 School Days: 9 Tatami Galazy: 9 Love Lab: 1 Free: 9 Samurai Champloo: 10 Gargantia: 4 Ghost in the shell: 17 Shinrei tantei yakumo: NULL POINTS Valvralve: 8 Umineko: 7 Angel Beats: 11 ToraDora: 9 Winners: Hyouka Michiko and Hatchin We will be watching 3 episodes of Hyouka and 2 episodes of Michiko and Hatchin per week.  I hope to see you all at future meetings       Apr. 11, 2013 at  6:01pm    Say farewell to Penguindrum ! This Saturday the final episodes will be shown, as well as, episodes 16-18 of Psycho-Pass . =D       Apr. 1, 2013 at  9:59pm    Welcome back! Follow your keen nose to this week’s showings of Psycho-Pass , episodes 14 & 15, and Penguindrum , 20-22. =D       Mar. 18, 2013 at  8:28pm    Enjoy Spring Break!!   Meetings on March 23rd and 30th are canceled due to vacation.       Mar. 15, 2013 at  5:58pm    We’re watching Psycho-Pass , episodes 12 & 13, and Penguindrum ,17-19, tomorrow at the usual time and place. The finales are just around the corner!        1 of 8  Next page    Not Quite by Peter Vidani Standing on Tumblr    #^$    Cal Animage Alpha     About   Officers  Contact Us     Events   Anime Destiny  Showings Schedule  Club Calendar     Konshuu   Read Online  Contribute     Join Us   Slack  Officer Application  Mailing List                 UC Berkeley's Anime Club    Madhouse Showings this week  We will be watching shows from the studio Madhouse this Wednesday!         Showings Wednesdays 8:00 - 9:00 PM Barrows 166    Game Night Thursdays 8:00 - 10:00 PM Wheeler 222                About CAA Cal Animage Alpha has been UC Berkeley's anime club since 1989. We hold a game night and a social every Thursday. We also have other events. All of these functions are open to the general public for free!   A History of CAA by Rodney Romasata     Cal Animage Alpha ("CAA") is the flagship chapter of a loosely organized international conglomeration of anime clubs all of which share the name "Cal Animage" (often, but not always, followed by the Greek letter denoting their entrance and acceptance into the group). Originally just a group of friends (with a VCR) CAA met in any number of various rooms on the University of California, Berkeley campus; Cal Animage was formally established by Mike Tatsugawa in January 1989.  While the debate is still on as to "who is the oldest anime club," CAA has the distinction and claim to fame of once being "the largest anime club outside of Japan." In 1994 (the peak of the club's popularity), the club's membership topped out at 329 (although there is some confusion as to the exact number since some didn't pay for membership that year!).  Many past officers both from CAA and other Cal Animage chapters have gone on to further spread anime. The Society for the Promotion of Japanese Animation (SPJA) [was] headed by Mike Tatsugawa and runs the annual Anime Expo. Other previous officers have moved on into the anime industry, both domestic and abroad. One in particular has worked on both sides of the Pacific Ocean and has written the liner notes for the AnimEigo release of the Macross DVD.  With the release of domestic anime, CAA has slowed down quite a bit. Membership has been fairly constant around 100. The main focus of the biweekly Sunday showings has been towards those titles that would have little chance of being released in America, yet popular enough to hold an audience's attention. A rather tall order, but the club is persisting.  Come to one of our Monday evening showings between 7:00 p.m. and 10:00 p.m. and maybe you'll see why the club is still able to hold its own.         Events  Weeklies  All showings and game nights held by Cal Animage Alpha are open to the general public for free. Anyone interested in anime, manga, and Japanese anime culture is invited to attend these events.  We are holding showings biweekly every Sunday this semester. Moreover, we will as always have our biannual anime marathon before finals! Come if you want to destress, eat food, and win raffle prizes!  Tentative Showings Schedule for Spring 2018   Game Nights are held on Thursdays from 8:00 PM to 10:00 PM.  We're always open to fun event ideas or new games to play during game nights! Have an idea or a suggestion? Share it with an officer !  Specials  Anime Destiny is our annual anime convention, held right here on campus! For more information, visit our website .         Konshuu Konshuu is Cal Animage Alpha's weekly newsletter, featuring articles and fanworks from both guests and current officers. Each issue includes an overview of the series that will be shown/read during weekly meetings, information about future events, and an assortment of articles on anime culture. The latest issue is available for free at each weekly showing, or you can read it online !  Guest submissions are always welcome! To contribute, visit j.mp/konsub .  If you're interested in becoming a regular contributor to the newsletter, please contact the current head — Josh (bubeez@berkeley.edu) — about working in the Konshuu department      Join Us  New Cal student? Interested in joining Cal Animage Alpha? Join our Facebook group , like our page, and introduce yourself! Also, come to game nights and all our events to meet our officers!    #^$